Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-5807
Insurer; third-party administrator; responsibilities.

(1) If an insurer utilizes the services of a third-party administrator, the insurer shall be responsible for determining the benefits, premium rates, underwriting criteria, and claims-payment procedures and for securing reinsurance, if any. The rules pertaining to these matters shall be provided, in writing, by the insurer to the third-party administrator. The responsibilities of the third-party administrator as to any of these matters shall be set forth in the written agreement between the third-party administrator and the insurer.

(2) It shall be the sole responsibility of the insurer to provide for competent administration of its programs.

(3) In cases when a third-party administrator administers benefits for more than one hundred certificate holders or subscribers on behalf of an insurer, the insurer shall, at least semiannually, conduct a review of the operations of the third-party administrator. The director may require the insurer to conduct an onsite audit of the operations of the third-party administrator.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 82;

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 23.